dictionaries/apertium-ko-jp.ko.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>

<alphabet></alphabet>

<sdefs>
	<!-- verbs -->
	<sdef n="vblex"/>
	<sdef n="pol"/><!-- polite -->
	<sdef n="pres"/>
	<!-- nouns -->
	<sdef n="n"/>
<!-- 	<sdef n="pl"/> -->
	<sdef n="acc"/>
</sdefs>

<pardefs>
	<pardef n="jip__n">
		<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>eul</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
		<!-- <e><p><l>deul</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> -->
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="sa/da__vblex">
		<e><p><l>yo</l><r>da<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pol"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="ar/da__vblex">
		<e><p><l>ayo</l><r>da<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pol"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
</pardefs>

<section id="main" type="standard">
	<e lm="jip"><i>jip</i><par n="jip__n"/></e>
	<e lm="saram"><i>saram</i><par n="jip__n"/></e>
	<e lm="sada"><i>sa</i><par n="sa/da__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="arda"><i>ar</i><par n="ar/da__vblex"/></e>
</section>
</dictionary>
